Illinois, session 104th, HB5724.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Reference to Act. This Act may be referred to as 5the Road to Census 2030 Act of 2026. 6    Section 5. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 7be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 8the Department of Human Services for costs and expenses 9related to Census 2030. Funds may be used for costs and 10expenses including, but not limited to, the opening of the 112030 State Census Office by June 30, 2027, planning for a 12statewide Notice of Funding Opportunity to occur after June 1330, 2027, and a 2030 Census Advisory Panel to be convened after 14June 30, 2027. 15    Section 10. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 17the Office of the Secretary of State for costs and expenses 18related to Census 2030. Funds may be used for costs and 19expenses, including, but not limited to, the planning for the 20launch of a public communications campaign to support 21participation in the 2030 Census after June 30, 2027, and 22planning for the launch and administration of a 2030 Complete   HB5724- 2 -LRB104 21055 KTG 35033 b1Count Commission after June 30, 2027. 2    Section 15. The sum of $1,600,000, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 4Fund to the Department of Public Health for costs and expenses 5related to Census 2030. Funds may be used for personnel and 6other costs incurred by the Department's Demographer's office 7related to preparing for Census 2030. Funds may also be used by 8the Department to coordinate with tribal and local governments 9to plan for and participate in the Local Update of Census 10Addresses (LUCA) of 2027, as authorized by the Census Address 11List Improvement Act of 1994. Funds may be distributed as 12sub-grants to tribal and local governments who voluntarily 13participate in LUCA according to 13 U.S.C. 16, including, but 14not limited to, tribal and local governments in communities 15where populations estimated by the United States Census Bureau 16to have been undercounted during the 2020 Census are more 17likely to reside. 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192026.